California statutes. Education Code
(e) On an annual basis, the governing board may increase the compensation of individual board members beyond the limits delineated in this section, in an amount not to exceed 5 percent based on the present monthly rate of compensation. Any increase made pursuant to this section shall be effective upon approval by the governing board. The action may be rejected by a majority of the voters in that district voting in a referendum established for that purpose, as prescribed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 9100) of Division 9 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 588, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

72025.

(a) The governing board of the Long Beach Community College District may establish trustee areas pursuant to this section.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

(1) If a proposal for the establishment of trustee areas is approved by a majority of the voters voting at the election, the establishment of trustee areas shall be effective upon the expiration of the term of the member having the shortest remaining unexpired portion of a term on the date of the election approving the establishment of trustee areas, or the date of expiration of the term of any member elected to the board during the year of the election approving the establishment of trustee areas, whichever is shorter.

(2) The term of any member serving on the board on the date of the election approving the establishment of trustee areas shall be shortened until the date of expiration of the term of the member having the shortest remaining unexpired portion of a term on the date of the election approving the establishment of trustee areas, or the date of expiration of the term of any member elected to the board during the year of the election approving the establishment of trustee areas, whichever is shorter.

(3) Vacancies shall be filled as provided by other provisions of law and the term of the person filling the vacancy shall be determined in accordance with paragraph (2).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 486, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

72026.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, if the governing board of a community college district finds that the boundaries of trustee areas do not conform to the district’s geography or population distribution due to annexation of territory to the district after the trustee boundaries were formed, the board may, in its discretion, order a special election seeking voter approval for rearrangement of such areas in the manner provided in this section.

(b) (1) Upon adoption of a resolution by a majority of the members, the board shall call and conduct at least one public hearing on the proposed rearrangement of trustee area boundaries by publishing notice of the proposed
 rearrangement in accordance with Section 6061 of the Government Code. The notice shall be published at least 10 days prior to each hearing to be held and shall state the time and place of the hearing and the general nature of the proposed boundary rearrangement.

(2) At the conclusion of the public hearing or hearings, the board may adopt a resolution by majority vote of its members ordering a special election on the proposed rearrangement of trustee areas within the district. The election shall be consolidated with the next scheduled primary or general statewide election and shall be called and conducted by the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction in the manner otherwise prescribed for elections in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5300) of Part 4 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(c) The ballot shall contain the following words properly located
 on the ballot: “Shall the trustee areas in _____ (insert name) Community College District be rearranged?” To the right of or below those words, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the rearrangement. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against its adoption.

 (d) If the proposal for the rearrangement of trustee areas within
 the district pursuant to this section is approved by a majority of the electors voting at the election and it appears that one or more trustee areas in the district will not be represented in the membership of the governing board or that one or more trustee areas will have more than its allotted number of representatives in the membership of the governing board, the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction shall call and conduct an election to determine who shall represent such trustee area or areas at the next regular election for community college trustees as otherwise provided by law. The term of office of a newly elected and qualified member shall expire on the date the term of the former member would have expired if the former member had remained in office. If the offices of two or more members become vacant due to the operation of this
 subdivision, the county superintendent of schools shall determine by lot which term of office of former members shall be assumed by which of the newly elected and qualified members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 10.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

72026.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in any district which has annexed or annexes territory resulting in a proposal for a rearrangement of trustee areas and which holds an election pursuant to Section 72026 and a rearrangement of boundaries is approved by the voters, in the event that such rearrangement results in a trustee area having more or fewer than its allotted number of representatives, a governing board member representing a particular trustee area whose boundaries are rearranged so that he or she no longer resides within the trustee area may serve out his or her term of office as that area’s representative. Succeeding representatives shall be selected in the manner provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

72027.

(a) Upon the formation of a community college district the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction shall call and set the date of an election for the purpose of electing the governing board of the district. The call shall be issued not later than 30 days after the formation of the district. The election shall be called, held, and conducted as are elections for members of governing boards of elementary school districts.

(b) The first members of the governing board shall take office on the third Monday following their election. The term of office of subsequent members of the board shall begin on the
 second
 Friday in December following their election.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction may call and set the date for an election for the purpose of electing the governing board of the district on the same date that the election is held for the formation of the community college district. The call for both elections shall be issued at the same time. The election shall be called, held, and conducted the same as elections for members of the governing boards of elementary school districts.

(d) The majority of the members of the first elected board of any newly formed community college district, the members of which majority received the highest number of votes, shall serve until the
 second Friday in December of the second succeeding odd-numbered year. The terms of the other members shall expire on the second Friday in December of the first succeeding odd-numbered year. Those members shall continue in office until their successors are elected and qualified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 146, Sec. 4.   (AB 2449)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

72029.

The governing board of a community college district may by resolution limit campaign expenditures or contributions in elections to district offices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 8, Sec. 27.   Effective April 15, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

72031.

The provisions of this section shall apply only to the Los Angeles Community College District.

(a) Whenever in this code a section refers to a district, or to two or more districts, governed by a single governing board, or by governing boards of identical personnel, or to a district or districts in which the average daily attendance is in excess of 400,000, or makes a similar reference, all provisions of the section shall apply with equal force to both the city school district and community college district.

(b) Commencing with the
 2019 election for the governing board of the Los Angeles Community College District, and each election thereafter, the governing board may adopt a resolution by majority vote to enact an alternative method by which members of the governing board of the Los Angeles Community College District may be elected by trustee area. The trustee shall be required to reside and be registered to vote in the trustee area he or she seeks to represent, and the trustee shall be elected by only the registered electors of the same trustee area. Upon certification of the election, the candidate with the highest number of votes for
 a trustee area shall be deemed the candidate elected for that trustee area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 243, Sec. 4.   (SB 628)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

72034.

Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 366 of the Statutes of 1982, the terms of office of the members of the governing board of the Santa Monica Community College District whose terms were scheduled to expire in April 1985, expired in November 1984, and the terms of office of those members whose terms were scheduled to expire in April 1987, shall expire in November 1986.

The terms of the members elected in November of even-numbered years shall commence on the first Tuesday following that election, and those elected shall serve for a term of four years. Each member shall continue to serve until his or her successor in office is elected and qualified.

This section is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1401, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72035.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law and the Charter of the City of San Diego, the number of members, the election of members, and the reapportionment of trustee areas of the governing board of the San Diego Community College District shall be conducted pursuant to this section.

(a) Candidates for election as a member of the governing board of the district shall be nominated by trustee area at a district primary election held on the date of the statewide direct primary election. At the district primary election, the two candidates receiving the highest number of votes within the trustee area shall be nominees for the general district election for that trustee
 area, and the nominee who receives a majority of the votes cast by the voters of the district in the districtwide general district election shall be elected to represent that trustee area. The general district election shall be held on the same date as the statewide general election.

(b) Candidates for election as members of the governing board shall do both of the following:

(1) File a declaration of candidacy as provided in this code.

(2) File nominating papers following the procedural and substantive requirements in Sections 10220 to 10227, inclusive, of the Elections Code, except to the extent those requirements conflict with the requirements in subdivision (a) or this
 paragraph. For the purposes of this
 paragraph, any reference to the city elections official in the Elections Code means the elections official of the county. Each candidate shall be proposed by not less than 40 nor more than 60 voters in a trustee area.

(c) Each member of the governing board elected at the general district election shall hold office for a term of four years commencing on the second Friday in December next succeeding the member’s election.

(d) The territory of the district shall be divided into trustee areas and one member of the governing board shall be elected from each trustee area. A candidate for election as a member of the governing board shall reside in, and be registered to vote in, the trustee area the candidate seeks to represent.

(e) The governing board of the district shall be composed of not less than five members and not more than nine, as determined by the governing board. Sections 5019 to 5030, inclusive, do not apply to the governing board’s determination of the number of members pursuant to this subdivision. If the number of members of the governing board is increased or decreased, the governing board shall establish new trustee areas, abolish trustee areas, or adjust the boundaries of trustee areas so that the number of trustee areas is equal to the number of governing board members. If the number of members of the governing board is increased, the additional members of the governing board shall be elected at the next regular general district election of board members
 occurring at least 123 days after the governing board approved the increased number of board members. Prior to the next general district election, the governing board shall divide by lot the additional trustee area positions that are created so that the term of one-half of the board members elected to those positions shall expire on the second Friday in December following the next general district election. The term of the other board members elected to fill the remainder of the additional positions shall expire on the second Friday in December following the second general district election succeeding their election.

(f) The governing board shall adjust the boundaries of each trustee area in existence on January 1, 1992, to reflect population changes enumerated in the 1990 decennial federal census. The purpose of the adjustment is to establish trustee areas so that the population of each area is, as nearly as may be, the same proportion of the total population of the district as each of the other areas. Thereafter, the boundaries of trustee areas shall be adjusted pursuant to Section 5019.5 and may be abolished or rearranged as otherwise provided in this code.

(g) Pursuant to Sections 5019 and
 5030, the county committee on school district organization may propose to the district voters that the member residing in each trustee area be elected by the registered voters of that particular trustee area. The proposal shall be submitted to the voters of the district at the next regular general district election occurring at least 123 days after the adoption of the proposal by the county committee on school district organization. If that proposal is approved by a majority of the voters voting in the election, then notwithstanding subdivision (a), there shall be no direct primary election for governing board members at the next election for members. Instead, members shall be elected at a general district election held on the same day as the statewide general election. At that general district election, board member candidates shall be elected to represent the trustee area in which they reside and
 are registered to vote by the registered voters of that trustee area. The candidate in each trustee area receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 624, Sec. 1.   (AB 1150)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

72036.

Notwithstanding any other law, the governing board of a community college district may change election systems, in accordance with the provisions of this section and the California Voting Rights Act of 2001 (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 14025) of Division 14 of the Elections Code), upon the adoption by the board of trustees of a resolution in support of electing the trustees in accordance with this section and upon the approval of the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, as follows:

(a) The governing board of a community college district may establish elections by trustee areas. In establishing trustee areas, the territory of a district shall be divided into trustee areas, and one member of the governing board shall be elected from each trustee area. A
 candidate for election as a member of the governing board shall reside in, and be registered to vote in, the trustee area the candidate seeks to represent. The governing board shall set the initial boundaries of each trustee area to reflect substantially equal population in each district as enumerated in the most recent decennial federal census. Thereafter, the boundaries of trustee areas shall be adjusted pursuant to Section 5019.5, and may be abolished or adjusted as otherwise provided in this code.

(b) The governing board of a community college district may establish a top-two primary election system. Candidates for election as a member of a governing board of a district shall be nominated by trustee area at a district primary election held on
 the date of the statewide direct primary election. At the district primary election, the two candidates receiving the highest number of votes within the trustee area shall be nominees for the district general election for that trustee area, and the nominee who receives a majority of the votes cast by the voters of the trustee area in the district general election shall be elected to represent that trustee area. The district general election shall be held on the same date as the statewide general election.

(c) The governing board of a community college district may determine the number of trustees pursuant to this subdivision. The governing board of a community college district shall be composed of not less than five members and not more than nine, as determined by the governing board. Sections 5019 to 5030, inclusive, do not apply to the governing board’s determination of the number of members pursuant to this subdivision. If the number of
 members of a governing board is increased or decreased, a governing board shall establish new trustee areas, abolish trustee areas, or adjust the boundaries of trustee areas so that the number of trustee areas is equal to the number of governing board members. If the number of members of a governing board is increased, the additional members of the governing board shall be elected at the next regular district general election of board members occurring at least 125 days after the governing board approved the increased number of board members. Before the next district general election, the governing board shall divide
 by lot the additional trustee area positions that are created so that the term of one-half of the board members elected to those positions shall expire on the first Friday in December following the next district general election. The term of the other board members elected to fill the remainder of the additional positions shall expire on the first Friday in December following the second district general election succeeding their election.

(d) This section shall not apply to any community college district that has been authorized by statute to provide for its own trustee elections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 139, Sec. 6.   (SB 442)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

72036.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the number of members, the election of members, and the reapportionment of trustee areas of the Governing Board of the Grossmont-Cuyamaca Community College District shall be provided for pursuant to this section and in accordance with the California Voting Rights Act of 2001 (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 14025) of Division 14 of the Elections Code).

(b) For purposes of this section, “district” means the Grossmont-Cuyamaca Community College District.

(c) Candidates for election as a member of the governing board of the district shall be nominated by trustee area at a district primary
 election held on the date of the statewide direct primary election. At the district primary election, the two candidates receiving the highest number of votes within the trustee area shall be nominees for the district general election for that trustee area, and the nominee who receives a majority of the votes cast by the voters of the trustee area in the district general election shall be elected to represent that trustee area. The district general election shall be held on the same date as the statewide general election.

(d) Each member of the governing board elected at the district general election shall hold office for a term of four years commencing on the second Friday in December following
 the member’s election.

(e) Candidates for election as members of the governing board shall do both of the following:

(1) File a declaration of candidacy as provided in this code.

(2) File nominating papers following the procedural and substantive requirements in Sections 10220 to 10227, inclusive, of the Elections Code, except to the extent those requirements conflict with the requirements of subdivision (c) or this paragraph. For the purposes of this
 paragraph, any reference to the city elections official in the Elections Code means the elections official of the county. Each candidate shall be proposed by not less than 40 nor more than 60 voters in a trustee area.

(f) The territory of the district shall be divided into trustee areas and
 one member of the governing board shall be elected from each trustee area. A candidate for election as a member of the governing board of the district shall reside in, and be registered to vote in, the trustee area the candidate seeks to represent.

(g) The governing board of the district shall be composed of not less than five members and not more than nine, as determined by the governing board. Sections 5019 to 5030, inclusive, do not apply to the governing board’s determination of the number of members pursuant to this subdivision. If the number of members of the governing board is increased or decreased, the governing board shall establish new trustee areas, abolish trustee areas, or adjust the boundaries of trustee areas so that the number of trustee areas is equal to the number of governing board members. If the number of members of
 the governing board is increased, the additional members of the governing board shall be elected at the next regular district general election of board members occurring at least 123 days after the governing board approved the increased number of board members. Prior to the next district general election, the governing board shall divide by lot the additional trustee area positions that are created so that the term of one-half of the board members elected to those positions shall expire on the second Friday in December following the next district general election. The term of the other board members elected to fill the remainder of the additional positions shall expire on the second Friday in December following the second district general election succeeding their election.

(h) Boundaries for trustee areas established by a resolution of the
 governing board of the district or adopted by the county committee on school district organization prior to January 1, 2012, to reflect population changes enumerated in the 2010 decennial federal census shall be in effect when this section becomes operative. The boundaries of each trustee area shall be set so that the population of each area is, as nearly as may be, the same proportion of the total population of the district as each of the other areas. Thereafter, the boundaries of trustee areas shall be adjusted pursuant to Section 5019.5 and may be abolished or rearranged as otherwise provided in this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 624, Sec. 2.   (AB 1150)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Meetings and Members [72101. - 72129.]



  ARTICLE 1. Membership [72101. - 72104.]

72101.

In newly formed districts for which an interim governing board is appointed by the county superintendent of schools, a governing board member election shall be held:

(a) When the action necessary for the formation of a new community college district is completed on or before the first of January of any odd-numbered year, on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in March of such year.

(b) When the action necessary for the formation of a new community college district is completed after the first of February of any year, whether even-numbered or odd-numbered, on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in March of the next succeeding year.

The terms of the members elected at the initial election shall begin on the first day of April, and the terms of their predecessors shall expire on the 31st day of March, following the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

72102.

When a member of the governing board of a community college district which is being reorganized and which will cease to exist takes office as a member of the initial or interim governing board of a newly formed community college district, he or she shall cease to be a member of the governing board of the district being reorganized.

The governing board of a community college district which is being reorganized shall then appoint another person who is eligible to serve on the governing board of the district being reorganized to the vacant position for the duration of the existence of the district being reorganized, but in no case for longer than 12 months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 304.)
-------------------------------------------

72103.

(a) Any person, regardless of sex, who is 18 years of age or older, a citizen of the state, a resident of the community college district, a registered voter, and who is not disqualified by the Constitution or laws of the state from holding a civil office, is eligible to be elected or appointed a member of a governing board of a community college district without further qualifications. 

(b) (1) An employee of a community college district may not be sworn into office as an elected or appointed member of that community college district’s governing board unless and until he or she resigns as an employee. If the employee does not resign, the employment will automatically terminate upon being sworn into office.

(2) For any individual who is an employee of a community college district and an elected or appointed member of that community college district’s governing board prior to January 1, 1992, this subdivision shall apply when he or she is reelected or reappointed, on or after January 1, 1992, as a member of the community college district’s governing board. This section does not apply to an individual who is usually employed in an occupation other than teaching and who also is employed part time by the community college district to teach no more than one course per semester or quarter in the subject matter of that individual’s occupation.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing board of a community college district may adopt or the residents of the community college district may propose, by initiative, a proposal to limit or repeal a limit on the number of terms a member of the governing board of the community college district may serve on the governing board of a community college district. Any proposal to limit the number of terms a member of the governing board of a community college district may serve on the governing board of a community college district shall apply prospectively only and shall not become operative unless it is submitted to the electors of the community college district at a regularly scheduled election and a majority of the votes cast on the question favor the adoption of the proposal.

(d) (1) An initiative measure proposed pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be subject to the procedures set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 9300) of Division 9 of the Elections Code.

(2) A proposal submitted to the electors by the governing board pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be subject to the procedures set forth in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 9500) of Division 9 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 432, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

72104.

No member of the governing board of a community college district shall, during the term for which he or she was elected, be eligible to serve on the governing board of a high school district whose boundaries are coterminous with those of the community college district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 3.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Meetings [72121. - 72129.]

72121.

Except as provided in Sections 54957 and 54957.6 of the Government Code and in Section 72122 of, and subdivision (c) of Section 48914 of, this code, all meetings of the governing board of any community college district shall be open to the public, and all actions authorized or required by law of the governing board shall be taken at the meetings and shall be subject to the following requirements:

(a) Minutes shall be taken at all of those meetings, recording all actions taken by the governing board. The minutes are public records and shall be available to the public.

(b) An agenda shall be posted by the governing board, or its designee, in accordance with the requirements of Section 54954.2 of the Government Code. Any interested person may commence an action by mandamus or injunction pursuant to Section 54960.1 of the Government Code for the purpose of obtaining a judicial determination that any action taken by the governing board in violation of this subdivision or subdivision (b) of Section 72129 is null and void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 641, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

72121.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature that members of the public be able to place matters directly related to community college district business on the agenda of community college district governing board meetings, and that members of the public be able to address the board regarding items on the agenda as such items are taken up. Governing boards shall adopt reasonable regulations to insure that this intent is carried out. Such regulations may specify reasonable procedures to insure the proper functioning of governing board meetings.

This subdivision shall not preclude the taking of testimony at regularly scheduled meetings on matters not on the agenda which any member of the public may wish to bring before the board, provided that no action is taken by the board on such matters at the same meeting at which such testimony is taken. Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to limit further discussion on the same subject matter at a subsequent meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 522.)
-------------------------------------------

72122.

The governing board of a community college district shall, unless a request by the student has been made pursuant to this section, hold closed sessions if the board is considering the suspension of, or disciplinary action or any other action in connection with any student of the community college district, if a public hearing upon the question would lead to the giving out of information concerning students which would be in violation of state or federal law regarding the privacy of student records.

Before calling a closed session of the governing board of the district to consider these matters, the governing board of the district shall, in writing, by registered or certified mail or by personal service, if the student is a minor, notify the student and his or her parent or guardian, or the student if the student is an adult, of the intent of the governing board of the district to call and hold the closed session. Unless the student, or his or her parent, or guardian shall, in writing, within 48 hours after receipt of the written notice of intention, request that the hearing of the governing board be held as a public meeting, then the hearing to consider those matters shall be conducted by the governing board in closed session. If the written request is served upon the clerk or secretary of the governing board, the meeting shall be public except that any discussion at the meeting that might be in conflict with the right to privacy of any student other than the student requesting the public meeting or on behalf of whom the meeting is requested, shall be in closed session. Whether the matter is considered at a closed session or at a public meeting, the final action of the governing board of the community college district shall be taken at a public meeting and the result of that action shall be a public record of the community college district.

The governing board of a community college district may hold closed sessions to consider the conferring of honorary degrees or to consider gifts from a donor who wants to remain anonymous.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 307.)
-------------------------------------------

72129.

(a) Special meetings may be held at the call of the president of the board or upon a call issued in writing and signed by a majority of the members of the board.

(b) A notice of the meeting shall be posted at least 24 hours prior to the special meeting and shall specify the time and location of the meeting and the business to be transacted and shall be posted in a location that is freely accessible to members of the public and district employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 641, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Powers and Duties [72203.5. - 72332.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [72203.5. - 72208.]

72203.5.

A member of the governing board of a community college district who has tendered a resignation with a deferred effective date pursuant to Section 5090 shall, until the effective date of the resignation, continue to have the right to exercise all powers of a member of the governing board, except that such member shall not have the right to vote for his or her successor in an action taken by the board to make a provisional appointment pursuant to Section 5091.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 267.)
-------------------------------------------

72205.

The approval of any state agency shall not be a prerequisite to acceptance by the governing board of any community college district of a gift, donation, bequest, or devise. No real or personal property, including money, accepted by a governing board pursuant to this section shall be considered in determining the eligibility of the district for an apportionment from the State School Fund nor in determining the amount thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 8, Sec. 28.   Effective April 15, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

72207.

The governing board of a community college district may secure copyrights, in the name of the district, to all copyrightable works developed by the district, and royalties or revenue from said copyrights are to be for the benefit of the district securing said copyrights.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

72208.

(a) The regional accrediting agency for the community colleges shall report to the appropriate policy and budget subcommittees of the Legislature upon the issuance of a decision that affects the accreditation status of a community college and, on a biannual basis, report any accreditation policy changes that affect the accreditation process or status for a community college.

(b) The Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall ensure that the appropriate policy and budget subcommittees of the Legislature are provided the information required to be reported pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) The regional
 accrediting agency shall report to the board of governors as soon as practicable after the National Advisory Committee on Institutional Quality and Integrity has notified the regional accrediting agency of the date by which the agency’s application for continued recognition is due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. College Police [72330. - 72332.]

72330.

(a) The governing board of a community college district may establish a community college police department under the supervision of a community college chief of police and, in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 88000) of Part 51, may employ personnel as necessary to enforce the law on or near the campus of the community college and on or near other grounds or properties owned, operated, controlled, or administered by the community college or by the state acting on behalf of the community college. Each campus of a multicampus community college district may designate a chief of police. 

(b) The governing board of a community college district that establishes a community college police department under subdivision (a) may also establish a police reserve officer program to supplement that police department.

(c) Persons employed and compensated as members of a community college police department, when so appointed and duly sworn, are peace officers as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(d) The governing board of a community college district that establishes a community college police department shall set minimum qualifications of employment for the community college chief of police, including, but not limited to, prior employment as a peace officer or completion of any peace officer training course approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training. A chief of security or chief of police shall be required to comply with the prior employment or training requirement set forth in this subdivision as of January 1, 1993, or a date one year subsequent to the initial employment of the chief of security or chief of police by the community college district, whichever occurs later. This subdivision may not be construed to require the employment by a community college district of any additional personnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 292, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

72330.2.

Every member of a California Community College police department first employed by a California Community College district before July 1, 1999, shall, in order to retain his or her employment, fulfill both of the following conditions:

(a) The employee shall submit to the district one copy of his or her fingerprints on forms prescribed by the Department of Justice. The Department of Justice shall forward this copy to the United States Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(b) The employee shall be determined to be a person who is not prohibited from employment by the California Community College district, and, if the employee is required to carry a firearm, shall be determined by the Department of Justice to be a person who is not prohibited from possessing a firearm.
